Washington statutes.
RCW 33.12.150

Contingent fund as reserve—Members' rights to fund limited.

The contingent fund shall constitute a reserve for the absorption of losses of a mutual association.

Members do not have, individually or collectively, any right or claim to the contingent fund except upon dissolution of the association.

[ 1982 c 3 s 27; 1981 c 84 s 3; 1963 c 246 s 4; 1961 c 222 s 2; 1945 c 235 s 51; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-170. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 63, 67; 1925 ex.s. c 144 s 7; 1919 c 169 s 8; 1913 c 110 ss 13, 14; 1903 c 116 s 5; 1890 p 56 s 31.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.